Illinois, session 104th, HB3472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by adding Section 28 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/28 new)7    Sec. 28. Opioid patients right to know.8    (a) Any health care practitioner authorized by applicable 9law to issue prescriptions for Schedule II controlled 10substances shall, prior to issuing an initial prescription for 11a Schedule II controlled substance or any other opioid pain 12reliever during a course of treatment for acute or chronic 13pain shall discuss with the patient or the patient's parent or 14guardian, if the patient is under 18 years of age and is not an 15emancipated minor, the risks associated with the drugs being 16described. The information discussed shall include, but is not 17limited to:18        (1) the risks of addiction and overdose associated 19    with opioid drugs and the dangers of taking opioid drugs 20    with alcohol, benzodiazepines, and other central nervous 21    system depressants;22        (2) the reasons why the prescription is necessary;23        (3) any alternative treatments available; and  HB3472- 2 -LRB104 10976 RLC 21058 b1        (4) any additional risks associated with the use of 2    the drugs being prescribed, specifically that opioids are 3    highly addictive, that there is a risk of developing a 4    physical or psychological dependence on the controlled 5    substance being prescribed, and that taking more opioids 6    than prescribed, or mixing the prescribed medication with 7    benzodiazepines, sedatives, or mixing opioids with alcohol 8    can result in fatal respiratory depression.9    (b) The discussion required by subsection (a) shall take 10place before issuing an initial prescription, and again prior 11to issuing the third prescription during a course of 12treatment.13    (c) The prescribing health care practitioner shall include 14a note in the patient's medical record that the patient or the 15patient's parent or guardian, as applicable, has discussed 16with the practitioner the risks of developing a physical or 17psychological dependence on the controlled dangerous substance 18and on alternative treatments that may be available.19    (d) This Section does not apply to prescriptions for a 20patient who is currently in an active treatment for cancer, 21receiving hospice care from a licensed hospice or palliative 22care provider, for a patient who is a resident of a long-term 23care facility, or to any medications being prescribed for use 24in the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence.